Idaho statutes. Title 31 COUNTIES AND COUNTY LAW
Chapter 14 FIRE PROTECTION DISTRICT
§ 31-1417. Corporate powers and duties of board of fire protection commissioners.

A board of fire protection commissioners shall have discretionary powers to manage and conduct the business and affairs of the district. The discretionary powers shall include, but not be limited to, the following:

To sue and be sued.

To purchase, hold, sell and convey real property, make such contracts, and purchase, hold, sell and dispose of such personal property as may be necessary or convenient for the purposes of this chapter.

To levy and apply such taxes for purposes under its exclusive jurisdiction as are authorized by law, and to approve the annual district budget by resolution of the board.

To make and execute all necessary contracts.

To adopt such rules and resolutions as may be necessary to carry out their duties and responsibilities.

To hire, pay, promote, discipline and terminate district employees, contractors and agents, or delegate such powers.

To set compensation and benefit levels for employees, commissioners, contractors and agents.

To appoint members of district appeals boards and investigatory boards for the purpose of handling personnel matters or disputes concerning fire code enforcement issues, and to appoint other boards or committees that commissioners deem necessary for carrying out the purposes and policies of this chapter.

To enforce the fire code and rules adopted by the state fire marshal pursuant to chapter 2, title 41, Idaho Code.

To charge and collect reasonable fees for services provided to residents of the fire protection district or city, in accordance with the provisions of sections 63-1311 and 63-1311A, Idaho Code.

§ 31-1417A. [Amended and Redesignated.]

§ 31-1418. Temporary inability of commissioner. [Repealed.]

Repealed by S.L. 2018, ch. 168, § 2, effective July 1, 2018.

§ 31-1419. Fire protection district has legal title to property.

The legal title to all property acquired under the provisions of this chapter shall immediately and by operation of law, vest in such fire protection district, and shall be held by such district in trust for and is hereby dedicated and set apart to the uses and purposes set forth in this chapter. Said board is hereby authorized and empowered to hold, use, acquire, manage, occupy, possess, sell, convey and dispose of said property, whether real or personal, as in this chapter provided; and to institute and maintain any and all actions and proceedings, suits at law or in equity necessary or proper in order to fully carry out the provisions of this chapter, or to enforce, maintain, protect or preserve any and all rights, privileges and immunities created by this chapter or acquired in pursuance thereof. In all courts, actions, suits or proceedings, the said board may sue, appear and defend, in person or by attorneys, and in the name of such fire protection district.

§ 31-1419A. [Amended and Redesignated.]

§ 31-1420. Procedure for sale, conveyance and disposition of property.

Real or personal property of a fire protection district may be sold, conveyed and disposed of by its board of commissioners whenever the board finds and by resolution declares that the district no longer has use therefor, subject to the following procedure:

If in the opinion of the board any such personal property does not exceed ten thousand dollars ($10,000) in value, the same may be sold without independent valuations, notice or competitive bids.

If in the opinion of the board any such personal property exceeds ten thousand dollars ($10,000) in value, then the board shall select two (2) individuals independent of the board who have the knowledge and expertise to determine the value of the personal property to assess the value of the property. The property may then be sold at public or private sale to the highest bidder for cash at not less than its minimum valuation, after due notice. If the property cannot be sold for the minimum valuation after reasonable efforts have been made, the board may then sell the property for adequate and valuable consideration as determined by the board. Any individual selected by the board to assess the value of personal property shall not be eligible to acquire that property.

All such real property shall be appraised by a certified appraiser who shall be selected by the board. It may then be exchanged for other real property of equivalent value as determined by the board or sold at public or private sale to the highest bidder for cash at not less than its appraised value, after due notice. If the property cannot be sold for the appraised value after reasonable efforts have been made, the board may then sell the property for adequate and valuable consideration as determined by the board.

Due notice of sale shall be accomplished if the notice describes the property to be sold (legal description, if real property), states the appraised value thereof (by separate items, if so appraised), and specifies the time, place and conditions of sale.

The notice shall be published in a newspaper having general circulation in the district at least twice, the first publication thereof to be not less than fifteen (15) days preceding the day of sale.

If such property is sold on terms, the board may contract for the sale of the same for a period of years not exceeding ten (10) years, with an annual rate of interest on all deferred payments not to exceed twelve percent (12%) per annum. The title to all property sold on contract shall be retained in the name of the district until full payment has been made by the purchaser. Any property sold by the board under the provisions of this section, either for cash or on contract, shall be assessed by the county assessor in the same manner and upon the same basis of valuation as though the purchaser held a record title to the property so sold. The board shall have authority to cancel any contract of sale, pursuant to law, if the purchaser shall fail to comply with any of the terms of such contract, and retain all payments paid thereon. The board may by agreement with the purchaser modify or extend any of the terms of any contracts of sale, but the total period of years shall not exceed ten (10) years.

Upon final payment pursuant to the sale of such real property, the president and secretary, pursuant to resolution of the board, shall duly execute and deliver an appropriate deed to the purchaser, and upon the accomplishment of the sale of such personal property, the president and secretary, pursuant to resolution of the board, shall duly execute and deliver an appropriate bill of sale to the purchaser.
(8) In addition to any other powers granted by law, the board of fire commissioners may, at their discretion, grant to or exchange with the federal government, the state of Idaho, any political subdivision, or taxing district of the state of Idaho, with or without compensation, any real or personal property or any interest in such property owned by the fire district or acquired by tax deed, after adoption of a resolution that the grant or exchange of property is in the public interest. Such resolution may be made at any regularly or specially scheduled meeting of the board. Notice of such grant or exchange shall be made in the same manner as set forth in subsections (4) and (5) of this section. The fire protection district’s execution and delivery of the deed conveying an interest in the property shall operate to discharge and cancel all levies, liens and taxes made or created for the benefit of the fire protection district and to cancel all titles or claims of title including claims of redemption to such real property asserted or existing at the time of such conveyance.

§ 31-1420A. Special levy conditions

Authorization [Null and void.]

§ 31-1421. Compensation and benefits — Expenses — Liability.

Fire protection district commissioners may receive reasonable compensation for their services as commissioners. The fire protection board shall fix commissioner benefits and compensation for the fiscal year. Compensation for performing district business shall not exceed one hundred dollars ($100) per day. If a city, county, state or federal declaration of emergency or disaster exists within the boundaries of the fire protection district, the board may set special compensation for commissioners by a resolution that shall be applied to commissioner compensation only upon a majority vote of the board and shall continue only for as long as the city, county, state or federal declaration of emergency or disaster remains in effect within the boundaries of the fire protection district. District business shall include time spent preparing for and attending regular and special board meetings and meetings of committees established by the board. Additional compensation, if approved by a majority of the fire protection board, may be calculated for commissioners who attend county or state agency meetings, educational classes, seminars and other miscellaneous district business. Commissioners may also participate in the district’s employee benefit package in the same manner as employees or volunteers. Any proposed commissioner benefits and annual compensation shall be published as a separate line item in the annual budget of the fire protection district.

Actual expenses of commissioners for travel, and other district expenses approved by the board, shall be paid to the commissioners in addition to their annual compensation and benefits. The payment for expenses shall be paid from the funds of the fire protection district on either a per diem basis or upon the presentation of itemized receipts to the treasurer.

The board shall fix the annual compensation and benefits to be paid to the other officers, agents and employees of the fire district, which shall be paid out of the treasury of the fire district.

The district shall be liable and responsible for the actions and omissions of the commissioners, officers, agents and employees of the district, when the commissioners, officers, agents and employees are performing their duties within the course and scope of their employment with the district and on behalf of the district.

§ 31-1422. Budget and hearing — Notice of hearing — Public inspection.

The fire protection district board shall adopt a budget and shall cause a public hearing to be held upon such budget, prior to certifying a tax levy to the board of county commissioners of each county within the district, or having a portion of its territory within the district.

Notice of the budget hearing meeting shall be posted at least ten (10) full days prior to the date of said meeting in at least one (1) conspicuous place in each fire protection district to be determined by the board; a copy of such notice shall also be published in a daily or weekly newspaper published within such district, in one (1) issue thereof, during such ten (10) day period. The place, hour and day of such hearing shall be specified in said notice, as well as the place where such budget may be examined prior to such hearing. A full and complete copy of such proposed budget shall be published with and as a part of the publication of such notice of hearing.

Such budget shall be available for public inspection from and after the date of the posting of notices of hearing as in this section provided, at such place and during such business hours as the board may direct.

A quorum of the board shall attend such hearing and explain the proposed budget and hear any and all objections thereto.

The fiscal year of a fire protection district shall commence either on the first day of October of each calendar year, or on the first day of January of each calendar year, as established by resolution of the fire protection district board of commissioners.

§ 31-1423. Levy — Recommended levy — Election.

Each year, immediately prior to the annual county levy of taxes, the board of commissioners of each fire protection district, organized and existing under this chapter, may levy a tax upon all the taxable property within the boundaries of such district sufficient to defray the cost of equipping and maintaining the district of twenty-four hundredths percent (.24%) of market value for assessment purposes, to be used for the purposes of this chapter and for no other purpose. The levy shall be made by resolution entered upon the minutes of the board of commissioners of the fire protection district, and it shall be the duty of the secretary of the district, immediately after entry of the resolution in the minutes, to transmit to the county auditor and the county assessor certified copies of the resolution providing for such levy. Said taxes shall be collected as provided by section 63-812, Idaho Code.

If two (2) or more fire protection districts consolidate into one (1) district, the provisions of section 63-802, Idaho Code, shall apply to the consolidated district’s budget request as if the former district which, in the year of the consolidation, has the higher levy subject to the limitations of section 63-802, Idaho Code, had annexed the other district or districts. In addition, the consolidated district shall receive the benefit of foregone increases accumulated by the former districts under section 63-802(1)(a), Idaho Code.
(2)(a) If two (2) or more fire protection districts consolidate into one (1) district, the provisions of section 63-802, Idaho Code, shall apply to the consolidated district’s budget request as if the former district which, in the year of the consolidation, has the higher levy subject to the limitations of section 63-802, Idaho Code, had annexed the other district or districts. In addition, the consolidated district shall receive the benefit of foregone increases accumulated by the former districts under section 63-802(1)(a), Idaho Code.

Provided however, that if the higher levy rate provided for in subsection (2)(a) of this section exceeds the lowest levy rate of any of the districts to be consolidated by more than three percent (3%), the commissioners of the districts consolidating shall recommend, by a majority of the commissioners of each district involved, at a public hearing where a quorum of each district board is present, a levy rate that falls between the highest levy rate and the lowest levy rate. In determining such recommended levy rate, the commissioners shall recommend a levy rate that shall be sufficient to defray the cost of equipping and maintaining the new consolidated district. If such recommended levy rate exceeds by more than three percent (3%) the lowest current district levy rate of any of the districts to be consolidated, an election shall be held in a manner consistent with the provisions of section 31-1414, Idaho Code. In such election, the electors residing in the fire protection districts seeking to consolidate shall vote to approve or disapprove the recommended levy rate and the proposed consolidation of districts. The question put to the electors shall be the same or similar to the question provided for in section 31-1414, Idaho Code, except that the question shall include, in addition to the language described in section 31-1414, Idaho Code, a reference to the recommended levy rate provided for in this section and a reference to the percentage change of such recommended levy rate from the levy rate in existence in each district in the immediately preceding year.

§ 31-1424. Duties of county commissioners.

The board of county commissioners, at the time of making the annual county levies, shall make a levy upon all the taxable property not exempt from taxation within each district within the county in the same amount as the levy made by the board of commissioners of each fire protection district, and shall certify such levy or levies to the county auditor, and said auditor shall extend such levy on the rolls of the county, as other county taxes are extended; such special taxes so levied, as aforesaid, shall constitute a lien upon the property so assessed and shall be due and payable at the same time and in all respects are to be collected in the same manner as the state and county taxes, except that the tax collector must keep a separate list thereof and must list said tax in his receipt to the taxpayers and must pay to the county treasurer as he pays other taxes, specify to the treasurer what taxes they are and take a separate receipt therefor, and keep separate accounts thereof.

§ 31-1424A. [Amended and Redesignated.]

§ 31-1425. Exemptions.

All public utilities, as defined in section 61-129, Idaho Code, shall be exempt from taxation under the provisions of this chapter and shall not be entitled to the privileges or protection hereby provided without their consent in writing filed with the clerk of the board of county commissioners. Provided however, the board of fire protection commissioners, may enter into an agreement with a public utility for the purpose of affording the privileges or protection provided by the fire protection district to all, or such portion, of the property of the public utility as may be agreed upon between the parties and upon such terms and conditions as may be mutually agreed upon between the parties to the agreement.

The board of county commissioners, upon application and recommendation of the board of fire protection commissioners, may, by an ordinance enacted by not later than the second Monday of July, exempt all or a portion of the unimproved real property within the district from taxation, and may exempt all or a portion of the taxable personal property within the district from taxation. Any ordinance of the board of county commissioners granting an exemption from taxation under the provisions of this section must provide that each category of property is treated uniformly. Notice of intent to adopt an ordinance which exempts unimproved real property shall be provided to property owners of record in substantially the same manner as required in section 67-6511(2)(b), Idaho Code, as if the ordinance were making a zoning district boundary change.

§ 31-1426. Handling of district funds.

The tax receipts collected by the county as provided for in section 31-1424, Idaho Code, and other funds shall immediately be paid over by the county treasurer to the treasurer of the fire protection district, who shall deposit the same in a bank and be handled in the manner prescribed by the state depository law and all other funds received, by or on behalf of the district, shall be deposited by the treasurer to the credit of the district fund and shall be drawn only upon voucher and by check bearing the signature of the treasurer and at least one (1) commissioner, or in the event that the treasurer is unavailable, checks may be signed by two (2) commissioners. Provided however, upon written resolution of the board, checks may be signed by designated representatives who have been bonded in amounts deemed appropriate by the board.

It is hereby made the duty of the treasurer of the fire protection district to keep account of the district’s funds; to place to the credit of the district all moneys received by him from the collector of taxes or from any other officer charged with the collection of taxes as the proceeds of taxes levied by the fire protection board, or from any other sources, and of all other moneys belonging to the district and to pay over all moneys belonging to the district on legally drawn warrants or orders of the district officers entitled to draw the same.

No checks or warrants shall be signed until it is determined that the payment has been legally authorized, that the money has been duly appropriated by the board, and that such appropriation has not been exhausted. No checks or warrants shall be drawn in excess of the moneys actually in the district treasury. Provided however, warrants may be issued in anticipation of a levy except as otherwise provided in this chapter. The district shall pay warrants presented for payment provided there is money in the treasury for that purpose.

All warrants for the payment of an indebtedness of a fire protection district which are unpaid due to lack of funds shall bear interest at a rate to be fixed by the fire protection board from the date of the registering of such unpaid warrants with the treasurer. Provided however, that the dollar amount of the warrants shall not exceed the revenue provided for the year in which the indebtedness was incurred.

§ 31-1427. Indebtedness prohibited — Exceptions.

The board of commissioners of a fire protection district organized pursuant to the provisions of this chapter shall have no power to incur any debt or liability, except to the extent for the purposes and in the manner hereinafter provided:

In the first year after organization, the board of a district may, for the purpose of organization, to finance general preliminary expenses of the district or for any other purpose of the fire protection district law, and before making a tax levy, incur an indebtedness not exceeding in the aggregate a sum equal to one cent ($.01) on each one hundred dollars ($100) of market value for assessment purposes of all real and personal property within the district.

Whenever the board of commissioners of a fire protection district shall determine that the interest of said district and the public interest or necessity require incurring an indebtedness exceeding the income and revenue provided for the year for the purposes of (a) acquiring, purchasing, constructing, improving and equipping lands, building sites and buildings together with the necessary appurtenant facilities and equipment and (b) acquiring and purchasing suitable equipment and apparatus necessary to provide fire protection, the board shall have the power and authority as hereinafter provided to issue general obligation coupon bonds not to exceed in the aggregate at any time two percent (2%) of market value for assessment purposes of the real and personal property in said district.

Whenever the board of a district shall deem it advisable to issue general obligation coupon bonds, the board shall provide for the issuance of such bonds by ordinance which shall specify and set forth all the purposes, objects and things required by section 57-203, Idaho Code, and make provision for the collection of an annual tax sufficient to (a) constitute a sinking fund for the payment of the principal thereof within thirty (30) years from the time of contracting said bonded indebtedness and (b) to pay the interest on such proposed bonds as it falls due.

The aforesaid ordinance shall also provide for holding an election with the notice in compliance with section 34-1406, Idaho Code. The election shall be conducted in the manner and form, the returns canvassed, and the qualifications of electors of the district voting or offering to vote shall be determined, as provided by the pertinent and applicable provisions of title 34, Idaho Code. The voting at such election must be by ballot and the ballot used shall be substantially as follows: “In favor of issuing bonds to the amount of .......... dollars for the purpose stated in Ordinance No. ......” and “Against issuing bonds to the amount of ......... dollars for the purpose stated in Ordinance No. .......” If at such election two-thirds (2/3) of the qualified electors voting at such election, assent to the issuing of such bonds and the incurring of the indebtedness thereby created for the purposes, objects, and things provided in said Ordinance No. ......, such bonds shall be issued in the manner provided by chapter 2, title 57, Idaho Code, the municipal bond law of the state of Idaho.

Bonds issued pursuant to the provisions of this section and the income therefrom shall be exempt from taxation except transfer and estate taxes.

§ 31-1428. Carry over — Fund balance.

The board of commissioners of a fire protection district may accumulate fund balances at the end of a fiscal year and carry over those fund balances into the ensuing fiscal year budget for equipping and maintaining the district. A “fund balance” is the excess of the assets of a fund over its liabilities and reserves.

§ 31-1429. Inclusion, annexation or withdrawal of area in cities.

Except as otherwise provided in section 50-224, Idaho Code, any area embraced within the limits of any city may, with the consent of the governing boards of such city and the respective fire protection district, expressed by ordinance or resolution, be included within the limits of a fire protection district, when formed, or be subsequently annexed thereto. Any area in any city embraced within the limits of a fire protection district, shall, upon the consent of the governing boards of such city and fire protection district, expressed by ordinance or resolution, be withdrawn from such fire district.

§ 31-1430. Cooperation and reciprocating use of firefighting forces and apparatus of districts and cities.

Fire protection districts shall have all of the powers given to political subdivisions of the state of Idaho as set forth in section 67-2339, Idaho Code, and sections 67-2326 through 67-2333, Idaho Code, inclusive, to enter into intra-agency and mutual aid agreements with other political subdivisions, including but not limited to counties, ambulance service districts, and municipalities in Idaho and in other states for the purposes of protecting property against loss by fire, protecting life, and for all other purposes of this chapter.

Any fire protection district or city fire department extinguishing a fire or responding to a call for emergency assistance to persons or property not situated within the taxing authority of the fire district or city fire department is authorized to charge a reasonable fee for the services provided and shall have a lien upon property serviced, which lien shall be filed of record against the property in the name of the district or city in the time and manner provided by section 45-507, Idaho Code, for liens of original contractors. Fire districts and cities are also authorized to charge reasonable fees for services provided to residents located within the fire district or city in accordance with the requirements and procedures contained in sections 63-1311 and 63-1311A, Idaho Code, and shall have a lien upon the property serviced as provided in this section.

§ 31-1430A. Cooperation between fire protection districts in Idaho and fire protection districts and municipalities of other states. [Repealed.]

§ 31-1430B. [Amended and Redesignated.]

§ 31-1431. Contracts between fire protection districts and individual property owners outside of district.

Fire protection districts subject to the conditions hereinafter set forth may, pursuant to the discretion of the fire protection board, contract with individual property owners whose property is situated outside of the external boundaries of the fire protection district within the state of Idaho or within any neighboring state to provide for the same measure of fire protection to such contracting property owner as is provided to property owners within the boundaries of such contracting fire protection districts. All such contracts shall be for a term of one (1) year and shall commence at 12:01 a.m. on January 1 of such year and expire at 12 midnight on December 31 of such year. Contracts shall provide for a monetary consideration to be paid in advance by such property owner and the monetary consideration shall be based upon the cost of providing such service to such property owner, including, but not limited to, covering the district’s administrative and contract preparation costs, including legal fees for preparation and review of the contracts, and shall also take into consideration the distance between such property and the fire station or other facility wherein the firefighting equipment of such fire protection district is kept. Monetary consideration shall in no event be less than the amount that would have been paid in taxes that would have been levied and assessed under the provisions of this chapter, if such property had been included within the boundaries of said fire protection district. The power herein granted is subject to the limitation that no such contract may be entered into with any property owner whose house and outbuildings are situate further distant from the firehouse or other facility wherein such district’s fire protection equipment is kept than the point on the external boundary of such district that is furthest distant from the firehouse or other facility wherein such district’s fire protection equipment is kept. Provided further, however, that all of the contiguous lands of any contracting property owner must be included in said contract unless a portion of such property owner’s lands are further distant from the firehouse where such district’s firefighting equipment is kept than the point on the external boundary of such fire protection district that is furthest distant from the firehouse, in which case such portion of said lands must be excluded. For the purpose of determining value of eligible property situate outside the state of Idaho, the board of commissioners of such fire protection district shall determine as nearly as possible what the assessed value of such lands outside the state of Idaho would be if the same were situate within the state of Idaho.

§ 31-1432. Construction of chapter.

The provisions of this chapter shall be liberally construed to effect the purposes thereof.

§ 31-1433. Continuation of existing districts — Validating acts of officers.

Nothing in this chapter shall be construed as impairing the legality or organization of any fire protection district heretofore organized pursuant to law, nor the legality of any act of such district done in accordance with the prior law, nor shall it be deemed to affect the legality of the election of any officer of any such existing fire protection district, and all directors and officers duly elected, qualified and holding office at the time of the taking effect of this chapter shall continue to serve in such office until the expiration of their present terms; provided, however, that such fire protection districts as have existed heretofore shall comply with the provisions of this chapter as soon as they can conveniently do so and thereafter be governed by the provisions of this chapter. Nor shall anything in this chapter be deemed in any way to affect the existing indebtedness of any fire protection district created under and by virtue of the provisions of chapter 30, title 30, Idaho Code. All such existing fire protection districts, and the lawful acts of their officers and agents, are hereby declared prima facie lawful as de facto fire protection districts; provided, however, that such districts shall comply with the provisions of this chapter as soon as they can conveniently do so and thereafter be governed by the provisions of this chapter.

§ 31-1434. Any dissolution.

Dissolution of any fire protection district organized under this chapter may be initiated by a petition signed by at least twenty-five percent (25%) of the holders of title, or evidence of title, to the real property within the fire protection district, requesting dissolution of such fire protection district, in the following manner:

The petition shall first be presented to the board of county commissioners of each county in which the fire protection district is situated, signed by the number of holders of title or evidence of title above provided, which petition shall clearly designate the boundaries of the fire protection district and shall state the name of the district and shall be accompanied by a map thereof. The petition, together with all maps and other papers filed therewith, shall, at proper hours, be open to public inspection in the office of the clerk of the board of county commissioners between the date of their said filing and the date of the election on the question of districts as hereafter provided. The petition may be in one (1) or in several papers. When such petition is presented to the board of county commissioners, and filed in the office of the clerk of the board, the said board shall set a time for hearing of such petition, which time shall not be less than four (4) nor more than six (6) weeks from the date of the presenting and filing of said petition. A notice of the time of such hearing shall be published by said board, once a week for three (3) successive weeks previous to the time set for such hearing, in a newspaper published within the county in which said district is situated. Said notice shall give the boundaries of the fire protection district and shall state that a petition has been filed to dissolve the same, and that on the date fixed for the hearing, any taxpayer within the district, may appear at the hearing and testify and/or present exhibits upon any issue pertaining to the proposed dissolution of the fire district, or may object to or support the proposed dissolution.

After hearing and considering any and all testimony and other evidence either made in favor of or in opposition to the dissolution of the fire district, if the board of county commissioners makes a sufficient factual finding that the majority of the residents of the fire district will receive no benefit by continuing the existence of the fire district, the county commissioners shall make an order granting the petition, with or without modification. Provided however, the board of county commissioners, after hearing and considering all testimony and other evidence either in favor of or in opposition to the dissolution of the fire district, cannot make a sufficient factual finding that the majority of the residents of the fire district will receive no benefit by continuing the existence of the fire district, the county commissioners shall make an order denying the petition. After the county commissioners have entered their order approving or denying such petition, the clerk of the board of county commissioners shall cause to be published, a notice of election to be held in such proposed fire protection district, for the purpose of determining whether or not the same shall be dissolved. Such notice shall plainly and clearly designate the boundaries of the fire protection district, its name, and further, that the election is to be held to decide the question of whether the fire protection district shall be maintained or dissolved. Such notice shall be published once in each week for three (3) successive publications prior to such election, in a newspaper published within the county aforesaid.

Such notice shall require the electors to cast ballots which shall contain the words “fire protection district dissolved .... yes” or: “fire protection district dissolved .... no” or words equivalent thereto. No person shall be entitled to vote at any election held under the provisions of this chapter, unless he shall possess all the qualifications required of electors under the general laws of the state and be a resident of the district.
The election qualifications of electors and canvass of the ballots shall be made in the same manner as provided for in sections 31-1406 and 31-1407, Idaho Code.

If a majority of the electors voting at such election shall vote to dissolve the fire protection district, the board of county commissioners shall, after certifying the results of such election, enter an order upon the minutes of its official proceedings dissolving said fire protection district, and such district shall thereupon be dissolved.

Provided, however, that whenever a petition requesting dissolution of a fire protection district is signed by the holders of title, or evidence of title, to all of the real property included within the fire protection district and is presented to the board of county commissioners of the county in which the fire protection district is situated, accompanied by a map clearly designating the boundaries of the district, the board of county commissioners shall set a time for hearing of such petition, which time shall not be less than four (4) nor more than six (6) weeks from the date of the presenting and filing of said petition. A notice of the time and place of such hearing shall be published by said board once a week for three (3) successive weeks previous to such hearing, in a newspaper published within the county in which the fire protection district is situated. Said notice shall give the boundaries of the fire protection district and shall state that a petition has been filed to dissolve the same, and that on the date fixed for the hearing, any resident, taxpayer, or creditor of such fire protection district may appear and offer any objection to the dissolving of the fire protection district. If at such hearing, no protests are made to the granting of the petition, the board of county commissioners shall enter an order upon the minutes of its official proceedings dissolving such fire protection district, and such district shall thereupon be dissolved. If, however, any protests from residents, taxpayers, or creditors of the district are entered at such hearing, the board of county commissioners shall, within thirty (30) days of said hearing, determine whether or not such fire protection district shall be dissolved and shall cause an order to that effect to be entered upon the minutes of its official proceedings. If the board determines that the fire protection district shall be dissolved, such dissolution shall be effective as of the date of the entry of such order upon the minutes.

The property of such district shall remain the property of the county in which such district is located and any money remaining in the fund of such district shall be expended in the maintenance and repair of the highways of such district whether such highways at the time of the dissolution, are in the incorporated territory or in unincorporated territory.

If the district is situated in two (2) or more counties, each board of county commissioners shall coordinate the hearing date and the publications of notice so that only one (1) hearing need be held. Unless otherwise agreed to by each board of county commissioners involved, the hearing shall be held at the administrative offices of the district, and the boards of county commissioners are hereby specifically authorized to act in a joint manner for such purposes. If an election is called, the boards of county commissioners shall provide that the election be held on the same day in each county, and the boards of county commissioners shall coordinate the canvass of the votes cast and make one (1) joint announcement. If a majority of votes in any county are against the dissolution of the district, such rejection shall void the dissolution of the district in all counties.

§ 31-1435. Separability.

The several parts and provisions of this chapter are hereby declared independent and severable and the invalidity of any part or feature thereof shall not affect, impair, or invalidate the remainder of said section, or any part thereof.

§ 31-1436. Nonliability of agency for delay in report of fire — Exception.

No person, corporation, partnership or association which is authorized by any city fire department, fire protection district or by any volunteer fire company to receive any report of fire or which agrees to receive and transmit the report to the fire department, fire protection district or volunteer fire company, shall be liable in any civil action for damage to property or persons, including death, caused by delay in reporting or failure to report the fire, unless the delay or failure is the result of the gross negligence of the person, corporation, partnership or association.